Missouri, session 2026, HB2489.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 188, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 188.345, to read as follows:
188.345. 1. For purposes of this section, the term "medically accurate and
unbiased information" means information that is:
(1) Verified or supported by the weight of medical research conducted in
compliance with accepted scientific methods;
(2) Recognized as correct and objective by leading medical organizations with
relevant expertise or government agencies, such as the:
(a) American Academy of Family Physicians;
(b) American Academy of Pediatrics;
(c) American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists;
(d) American College of Physicians;
(e) American Medical Association;
(f) American Psychological Association;
(g) American Public Health Association;
(h) Centers for Disease Control and Prevention;
(i) Food and Drug Administration;
(j) National Cancer Institute; or
(k) National Institutes of Health; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2489 2
(3) Recommended by or affirmed in the medical practice guidelines of a
nationally recognized accrediting organization, such as the:
(a) Joint Commission;
(b) National Committee for Quality Assurance (NCQA);
(c) American Accreditation HealthCare Commission or Utilization Review
Accreditation Commission (AAHC/URAC); or
(d) Accreditation Association for Ambulatory Health Care (AAAHC).
2. For purposes of this section, the term "pregnancy-related services" includes,
but is not limited to, family planning, abortion care, prenatal care, labor and delivery,
and postpartum care.
3. To be eligible to receive state funding, all organizations that provide
pregnancy-related services or counseling shall provide medically accurate and unbiased
information on all relevant reproductive health options including, but not limited to,
information about birth control, pregnancy, adoption, labor and delivery, and
postpartum care.
✔